tools/spellcheckers/test/desktopspeller-gt-norm-yamls/spellertests_desktopspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Compound tests: # testing different compounding patterns that should be accepted:
    gålle+N+Sem/Mat+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giella+N+Sem/Lang_Tool-catch+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#bálkká+N+Sem/Money+Sg+Nom: gållegiellabálkká
    giella+N+Sem/Lang_Tool-catch+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [~giel-, giella-]
    gålle+N+Sem/Mat+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giella+N+Sem/Lang_Tool-catch+Sg+Nom: [gållegiella, ~gållegiel]
    giella+N+Sem/Lang_Tool-catch+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gålle+N+Sem/Mat+Sg+Nom: [~gielgålle, giellagålle]
    e-mæjlla+Area/NO+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Nom: e-mæjlla
    e-mæjlla+Area/SE+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Nom: e-mäjlla
    e-mæjlla+Area/NO+N+Sem/Txt+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#adræssa+Area/NO+N+Sem/Plc-abstr+Sg+Ill: [e-mæjllaadræssaj, ~e-mäjllaadræssaj, ~e-mäjllaadrässaj, ~e-mæjllaadrässaj]
    e-mæjlla+Area/SE+N+Sem/Txt+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#adræssa+Area/SE+N+Sem/Plc-abstr+Sg+Ill: [~e-mæjllaadræssaj, ~e-mäjllaadræssaj, e-mäjllaadrässaj, ~e-mæjllaadrässaj]
#    priváhtta+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#e-mæjlla+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Nom: [priváhta-#e-mæjlla, priváhta-#e-mäjlla, priváhtalasj-#e-mæjlla, priváhtalasj-#e-mäjlla, ~priváhta#e-mæjlla, ~priváhta#e-mäjlla]
#    priváhtta+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#e-mæjlla+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Nom:          [~priváhta#e-mæjlla, ~priváhta#e-mäjlla]
